Utah statutes.
58-75-301.   Licensure required -- Issuance of licenses -- Effect on
insurers.
(1)  Beginning January 1, 2002, and except as provided in Sections 58-1-307
and 58-75-304, a license is required to engage in the practice of genetic
counseling.
(2)  The division shall issue to any person who qualifies under this chapter a
license to practice genetic counseling.
(3)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require payment from
insurers for genetic counseling services.
